Utah statutes.
67-4a-206.   Deposits held by utilities.
A deposit, including any interest on it, made by a subscriber with a utility
to secure payment and any sum paid in advance for utility services to be
furnished, less any lawful deductions, that remains unclaimed by the owner for
more than one year after termination of the services for which the deposit or
advance payment was made is considered abandoned.
